North Carolina statutes. Chapter 52C. Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.
Article 2. Jurisdiction.
§ 52C-2-211.
Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal support order.

A tribunal of this State issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of this State has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

A tribunal of this State may not modify a spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

A tribunal of this State that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order may serve as:

An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in this State; or

A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal support order.

History.

2015-117, s. 1.

Official Comment (2015)

The amendment to subsection (b) ensures that the restriction on modification of an out-of-state spousal-support order extends to a foreign order. At the same time, subsection (b) provides that the question of continuing, exclusive jurisdiction be resolved under the law of the issuing tribunal. Thus, if a foreign spousal- support order were subject to modification in another country by the law of the issuing tribunal, this section would permit modification in a tribunal of this state.

Related to Convention: art. 2. Scope.